Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-177
Banks; consolidation; approval required; creditors' claims.

Any bank, which is in good faith winding up its business for the purpose of consolidating with some other financial institution, may transfer its resources and liabilities to the financial institution with which it is in the process of consolidation, but no consolidation shall be made without the consent of the director, nor shall such consolidation operate to defeat the claim of any creditor or hinder any creditor in the collection of his or her debt against any such bank or financial institution.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 41, p. 86;

R.S.1913, § 320;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 41, p. 701;

C.S.1922, § 8021;

C.S.1929, § 8-160;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 36, p. 154;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-160;

R.S.1943, § 8-164;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 77, p. 164;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 73.

An indebtedness of a bank incurred in an attempted liquidation in violation of this section is ultra vires and does not furnish the foundation for stockholders' double liability. Luikart v. Jones, 138 Neb. 472, 293 N.W. 346 (1940).

This section does not, of itself, make a consolidated bank liable for debts of old banks. Wilson v. Continental National Bank, 130 Neb. 614, 266 N.W. 68 (1936).

Two state banks cannot consolidate without consent of banking department, and sale of entire capital stock to stockholder, president and director of rival bank is not necessarily a consolidation within the meaning of this section. Cooper v. Bane, 110 Neb. 83, 196 N.W. 119 (1923).